es: Capacidad de eliminación de patógenos: Bacterias; Protozoos; Virus; Otro
vi: Khả năng loại bỏ mầm bệnh: Vi khuẩn; Động vật nguyên sinh; Virus; Khác
sv: Kapacitet för borttagning av patogener: Bakterier; Protozoer; Virus; Övrigt
de: Eigenschaft zur Pathogenentfernung: Bakterien; Protozoen; Viren; Sonstige
pl: Zdolność usuwania patogenów: Bakterie; Pierwotniaki; Wirusy; Inne
pt-PT: capacidade de remoção de agentes patogénicos: Bactérias; Protozoários; Vírus; Outro
ja: 病原体除去機能: バクテリア; 原虫; ウイルス; その他
ro-RO: Capacitate de eliminare a agenților patogeni: Bacterii; Protozoare; Viruși; Altele
nl: Ziekteverwekker verwijdering capaciteit: Bacteriën; Protozoa; Virussen; Overig
da: Evne til at fjerne patogener: Bakterier; Protozoer; Virus; Andet
bg-BG: Способност за премахване на патогени: Бактерии; Протозои; Вируси; Друго
hu: Kórokozó-eltávolítási képesség: Baktériumok; Protozoák; Vírusok; Egyéb
sl-SI: Zmožnost odstranjevanja patogenov: Bakterije; Praživali; Virusi; Drugo
nb: Funksjonalitet for fjerning av patogener: Bakterier; Protozoer; Virus; Annet
fi: Patogeenien poistokyky: Bakteerit; Alkueläimet; Virukset; Muu
tr: Patojen giderme kapasitesi: Bakteri; Protozoa; Virüs; Diğer
fr: Capacité d’élimination des agents pathogènes: Bactéries; Protozoaires; Virus; Autre
sk-SK: Schopnosť odstraňovať patogény: Baktérie; Prvoky; Vírusy; Iné
en: Pathogen removal capability: Bacteria; Protozoa; Viruses; Other
pt-BR: Patógeno capacidade de remoção: Bactérias; Protozoários; Vírus; Outros
el: Δυνατότητα αφαίρεσης παθογόνου: Βακτήρια; Πρωτόζωα; Ιοί; Άλλο
lt-LT: Patogenų pašalinimo galimybės: Bakterijos; Pirmuonys; Virusai; Kita
th: ความสามารถในการกำจัดเชื้อโรค: แบคทีเรีย; โปรโตซัว; ไวรัส; อื่นๆ
it: Capacità di rimozione dei patogeni: Batteri; Protozoi; Virus; Altro
cs: Funkce odstraňování patogenů: Bakterie; Prvoci; Viry; Ostatní
zh-TW: 病原體去除能力: 細菌; 原蟲; 病毒; 其他
ko: 병원체 제거 기능: 박테리아; 원생동물; 바이러스; 기타
zh-CN: 病原体去除能力: 细菌; 原虫; 病毒; 其他
hr-HR: Mogućnost uklanjanja patogena: Bakterije; Protozoe; Virusi; Ostalo
ru: Способ удаления патогенов: Бактерии; Простейшие; Вирусы; Другое